Vermont, session 2025-2026, S216.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
(a) Findings. The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Vermont’s natural landscape has been influenced by humans for
centuries, but, since European settlement, much of the infrastructure, such as
VT LEG #385760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.216
2026 Page 2 of 8
dams, old roads, berms, undersized culverts, bridges, and mines, causes long-
term negative impacts on natural and human communities long after the
intended use and in some cases past a safe threshold of functionality.
(2) Over the last two centuries, human channel management practices,
such as riverbank armoring, straightening, dredging, and berming, have created
a degraded condition in many Vermont rivers and streams where flows are
largely kept within the channel, resulting in increased stream power, reduced
access to floodplains, and increased erosion hazards and flood damages.
(3) As Vermont experiences a rapidly warming climate, implementation
of water restoration projects can help prevent public harm and property
damage while also working to address and reverse some of the direct causes of
impairment by restoring natural processes such as sediment transport,
floodplain function, water flow and filtration, soil stabilization, nutrient
cycling, and native species interaction and succession.
(4) Restored stream and river systems can attenuate flood waters, filter
stormwater, store carbon, and provide habitat refuge for diverse species.
Protecting these natural systems will best prepare us to adapt for our future.
Improved conditions for species diversity within an ecosystem enhances its
stability and ability to recover from disturbance.
(5) Dam removal projects are river restoration projects that offer many
benefits to flood resilience, public safety, aquatic habitat, stream equilibrium,
VT LEG #385760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.216
2026 Page 3 of 8
water quality, and recreation. Studies have found that the long-term ecological
benefits, such as improved water quality and temperature, natural sediment
transport, and resident and migratory species passage and recovery,
demonstrate that dam removal is an effective long-term river restoration tool.
(6) The Vermont General Assembly enacted 2024 Acts and Resolves
No. 121, known as the Flood Safety Act, that requires a State policy of a net
gain of wetlands to be achieved through protection of existing wetlands and
restoration of wetlands that were previously adversely affected.
(7) Ecological restoration is prioritized in numerous State and regional
plans, including Vermont’s Climate Action Plan, the Resilience
Implementation Strategy, Vermont Conservation Design, the State Wildlife
Action Plan, and Lake Champlain Basin Program’s Opportunities for Action.
(8) By reducing the impacts of flooding on communities and
infrastructure, river and stream restoration projects can also reduce the damage
caused by increasingly frequent flooding and the cost of repairs and recovery
while reducing the costs of delays.
(9) The development review process for water restoration projects
results in significant delays and adds unnecessary costs. As these types of
projects are often publicly funded, the goal is to limit the strain on these
resources and complete as many water restoration projects as possible with
VT LEG #385760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.216
2026 Page 4 of 8
these limited funds to make communities as flood and drought resilient as
possible.
(b) Purpose.
(1) The damage from the devastating floods of 2023 and 2024 was
compounded by centuries of human activities that have led to the degradation
of Vermont’s rivers and their surrounding watersheds. There is a need to
restore the natural functions of waters of the State and the associated
floodplains and wetlands in order to address flood and drought resiliency,
water quality degradation, and biodiversity decline.
(2) Despite this need, water restoration projects currently require a
complicated regulatory review process involving multiple state permits in
order to move the projects forward. However, these permits were created to
ensure that development would limit impacts to natural systems and, therefore,
these permits are inappropriate for ecological restoration since they create
barriers that delay implementation and increase the cost of critical restoration
projects.
(3) Due to an urgent need to achieve the public safety and long-term
ecological benefits of water restoration projects, such as dam removals,
traditional development projects and restoration projects must be regulated
differently, and with a categorically elevated degree of efficiency for
restoration projects. Under this proposal, the Department of Environmental
VT LEG #385760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.216
2026 Page 5 of 8
Conservation and the Department of Fish and Wildlife should work together to
establish general permit criteria for water restoration projects. This would
provide a holistic approach that streamlines the regulatory process, and
promotes efficient, effective restoration to meet the scale of the problems that
the State’s river systems and human communities face.
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. chapter 47, subchapter 3B is added to read:
Subchapter 3B. River Restoration Projects
§ 1361. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Ecological restoration” means the process of assisting in the
recovery of the structure and function of a natural condition following negative
impacts through human actions, such as development including infrastructure
and altering rivers and flood plains.
(2) “Ecosystems” are dynamic communities of plants, animals, and
microorganisms interacting with their physical environment.
(3) “Dam removal” means all actions needed to eliminate the risk of
dam failure–related inundation below the dam and channel instability upstream
of the dam, including partial or complete structural removal to the extent that
the dam is no longer capable of impounding water, liquid, or sediment and
natural river functions are restored, including sediment transport and upstream
and downstream aquatic organism passage.
VT LEG #385760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.216
2026 Page 6 of 8
(4) “Secretary” means the Secretary of Natural Resources.
§ 1362. RIVER RESTORATION PROJECTS; GENERAL PERMIT
(a) On or before December 1, 2026, the Secretary shall adopt by rule a
general permit for ecological restoration projects for waters of the State with
the explicit objectives of increasing flood resilience, improving water quality,
and increasing biodiversity that are accomplished through natural resources
restoration practices including dam removal, culvert replacement, berm
removal, and floodplain restoration projects.
(b) The general permit shall consider whether all or some of the criteria of
the following current permits should be incorporated into a water restoration
general permit, including a stream alteration permit, a dam safety order, a
wetlands determination or permit, a rare and threatened species review, a Clean
Water Act Section 401 water quality certification, a stormwater construction
general or individual permit, an insignificant waste management event permit,
and a shoreland protection permit.
§ 1363. DAM SAFETY ORDER
(a) The Department of Environmental Conservation Dam Safety Program,
in coordination with stakeholders including engineers, municipalities, utilities,
project proponents, and restoration practitioners, shall examine the
environmental review process required for a dam order needed for repair or
rehabilitation of existing dams under 10 V.S.A. chapter 43 and consider what,
VT LEG #385760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.216
2026 Page 7 of 8
and to what extent, other factors should be considered before a dam order for
repair is granted.
(b) The examination required by subsection (a) of this section shall
encompass the scope of the current environmental review process and the
effects of the proposed project on public safety as required in section 1086 of
this title, as well as the impacts on ecological restoration for flood resiliency,
and include prioritization of the following:
(1) identify improvements that will more comprehensively address the
public safety and environmental impacts of these projects, including an
alternatives analysis for dam breaching or dam removal;
(2) identify specific criteria that the Department of Fish and Wildlife
investigation required under section 1084 of this title will address to limit
impacts on fish and wildlife in the vicinity of a dam; and
(3) that the greatest benefit to the people of the State shall include
ecological restoration, as well as public safety, scenic and recreational values,
fish and wildlife, existing public recreational uses, creation of any hazard to
public use, and attainment of Vermont Water Quality Standards, and how each
of these factors weighs into the recommendations in the dam order.
Sec. 3. IMPLEMENTATION; REPORT TO GENERAL ASSEMBLY
On or before December 1, 2027, the Department of Environmental
Conservation shall submit to the House Committee on Environment and the
VT LEG #385760 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.216
2026 Page 8 of 8
Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy the recommended
changes to the dam safety environmental review process required under 10
V.S.A. § 1363. The recommendations shall include potential statutory changes
to 10 V.S.A. chapter 43 that address the factors listed in 10 V.S.A. § 1363(b).
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385760 v.1